Utah statutes.
36-14-5.   Legislative subpoenas -- Enforcement.
(1)  If any person disobeys or fails to comply with a legislative subpoena, or
if a person appears before a legislative body pursuant to a subpoena and
refuses to testify to a matter upon which he may be lawfully interrogated,
that person is in contempt of the Legislature.
(2) (a)  When the subject of a legislative subpoena disobeys or fails to
comply with the legislative subpoena, or if a person appears before a
legislative body pursuant to a subpoena and refuses to testify to a matter
upon which the person may be lawfully interrogated, the issuer may:
(i)  file a motion for an order to compel obedience to the subpoena with the
district court;
(ii)  file, with the district court, a motion for an order to show cause why
the penalties established in Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 3, Contempt, should
not be imposed upon the person named in the subpoena for contempt of the
Legislature; or
(iii)  pursue other remedies against persons in contempt of the Legislature.
(b) (i)  Upon receipt of a motion under this subsection, the court shall
expedite the hearing and decision on the motion.
(ii)  A court may:
(A)  order the person named in the subpoena to comply with the subpoena; and
(B)  impose any penalties authorized by Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 3,
Contempt, upon the person named in the subpoena for contempt of the
Legislature.
(3) (a)  If a legislative subpoena requires the production of accounts, books,
papers, documents, or other tangible things, the person or entity to whom it
is directed may petition a district court to quash or modify the subpoena at
or before the time specified in the subpoena for compliance.
(b)  An issuer may respond to a motion to quash or modify the subpoena by
pursuing any remedy authorized by Subsection (2).
(c)  If the court finds that a legislative subpoena requiring the production
of accounts, books, papers, documents, or other tangible things is
unreasonable or oppressive, the court may quash or modify the subpoena.
(4)  Nothing in this section prevents an issuer from seeking an extraordinary
writ to remedy contempt of the Legislature.
(5)  Any party aggrieved by a decision of a court under this section may
appeal that action directly to the Utah Supreme Court.
